Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.778

Risk management—Liability account—Actuarial studies.

The department shall conduct periodic actuarial studies to determine the amount of money needed to adequately fund the liability account.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 506; 2002 c 332 s 9; 1989 c 419 s 11. Formerly RCW 43.41.340, 43.19.19369.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.

Liability account created: RCW 4.92.130.